src/clock-fin.lexc
Multichar_Symbols


!@P.1.ON@ @D.1.ON@ @C.1@ 
!@P.2.ON@ @D.2.ON@ @C.2@ 
!@P.3.ON@ @D.3.ON@ @C.3@ 
!@P.4.ON@ @D.4.ON@ @C.4@ 
!@P.5.ON@ @D.5.ON@ @C.5@ 
!@P.6.ON@ @D.6.ON@ @C.6@ 
!@P.7.ON@ @D.7.ON@ @C.7@ 
!@P.8.ON@ @D.8.ON@ @C.8@ 
!@P.9.ON@ @D.9.ON@ @C.9@ 
!@P.10.ON@ @D.10.ON@ @C.10@ 
!@P.11.ON@ @D.11.ON@ @C.11@ 
!@P.12.ON@ @D.12.ON@ @C.12@ 


@U.TIME.1@ 
@U.TIME.2@ 
@U.TIME.3@ 
@U.TIME.4@ 
@U.TIME.5@ 
@U.TIME.6@ 
@U.TIME.7@ 
@U.TIME.8@ 
@U.TIME.9@ 
@U.TIME.10@ 
@U.TIME.11@ 
@U.TIME.12@ 

LEXICON Root

%01@U.TIME.1@:@U.TIME.1@     AFT ;    !01:00 - 01:19
%01@U.TIME.2@:@U.TIME.2@     BEF ;    !01:20 - 01:59
%02@U.TIME.2@:@U.TIME.2@     AFT ;    !02:00 - 02:19
%02@U.TIME.3@:@U.TIME.3@     BEF ;    !02:20 - 02:59
%03@U.TIME.3@:@U.TIME.3@     AFT ;    !03:00 - 03:19
%03@U.TIME.4@:@U.TIME.4@     BEF ;    !03:20 - 03:59
%04@U.TIME.4@:@U.TIME.4@     AFT ;    !04:00 - 04:19
%04@U.TIME.5@:@U.TIME.5@     BEF ;    !04:20 - 04:59
%05@U.TIME.5@:@U.TIME.5@     AFT ;    !05:00 - 05:19
%05@U.TIME.6@:@U.TIME.6@     BEF ;    !05:20 - 05:59
%06@U.TIME.6@:@U.TIME.6@     AFT ;    !06:00 - 06:19
%06@U.TIME.7@:@U.TIME.7@     BEF ;    !06:20 - 06:59
%07@U.TIME.7@:@U.TIME.7@     AFT ;    !07:00 - 07:19
%07@U.TIME.8@:@U.TIME.8@     BEF ;    !07:20 - 07:59
%08@U.TIME.8@:@U.TIME.8@     AFT ;    !08:00 - 08:19
%08@U.TIME.9@:@U.TIME.9@     BEF ;    !08:20 - 08:59
%09@U.TIME.9@:@U.TIME.9@     AFT ;    !09:00 - 09:19
%09@U.TIME.10@:@U.TIME.10@   BEF ;  !09:20 - 09:59
1%0@U.TIME.10@:@U.TIME.10@   AFT ;  !10:00 - 10:19
1%0@U.TIME.11@:@U.TIME.11@   BEF ;  !10:20 - 10:59
11@U.TIME.11@:@U.TIME.11@    AFT ;   !11:00 - 11:59
11@U.TIME.12@:@U.TIME.12@    BEF ;   !11:19 - 11:59
12@U.TIME.12@:@U.TIME.12@    AFT ;   !12:00 - 12:19
12@U.TIME.1@:@U.TIME.1@      BEF ;     !12:19 - 12:59
13@U.TIME.1@:@U.TIME.1@      AFT ;     !13:00 - 13:19
13@U.TIME.2@:@U.TIME.2@      BEF ;     !13:19 - 13:59
14@U.TIME.2@:@U.TIME.2@      AFT ;     !14:00 - 114:19
14@U.TIME.3@:@U.TIME.3@      BEF ;     !14:19 - 14:59
15@U.TIME.3@:@U.TIME.3@      AFT ;     !15:00 - 15:19
15@U.TIME.4@:@U.TIME.4@      BEF ;     !15:19 - 15:59
16@U.TIME.4@:@U.TIME.4@      AFT ;     !16:00 - 16:19
16@U.TIME.5@:@U.TIME.5@      BEF ;     !16:19 - 16:59
17@U.TIME.5@:@U.TIME.5@      AFT ;     !17:00 - 17:19
17@U.TIME.6@:@U.TIME.6@      BEF ;     !17:19 - 17:59
18@U.TIME.6@:@U.TIME.6@      AFT ;     !18:00 - 18:19
18@U.TIME.7@:@U.TIME.7@      BEF ;     !18:19 - 18:59
19@U.TIME.7@:@U.TIME.7@      AFT ;     !19:00 - 19:19
19@U.TIME.8@:@U.TIME.8@      BEF ;     !19:20 - 19:59
2%0@U.TIME.8@:@U.TIME.8@     AFT ;    !20:00 - 20:19
2%0@U.TIME.9@:@U.TIME.9@     BEF ;    !20:20 - 20:59
21@U.TIME.9@:@U.TIME.9@      AFT ;     !21:00 - 21:19
21@U.TIME.10@:@U.TIME.10@    BEF ;   !21:20 - 21:59
22@U.TIME.10@:@U.TIME.10@    AFT ;   !22:00 - 22:19
22@U.TIME.11@:@U.TIME.11@    BEF ;   !22:19 - 22:59
23@U.TIME.11@:@U.TIME.11@    AFT ;   !23:00 - 23:19
23@U.TIME.12@:@U.TIME.12@    BEF ;   !23:19 - 23:59
24%:%0%0:kaksitoista       # ;      !24:00
%0%0@U.TIME.12@:@U.TIME.12@  AFT ; !00:00 - 00:19
%0%0@U.TIME.12@:@U.TIME.12@  BEF ; !00:19 - 00:59


LEXICON BEF
%:2%0:kymmentä%         TOHALF ;
 %:21:yhdeksän%	    TOHALF ;
 %:22:kahdeksan%       TOHALF ;
 %:23:seitsemän%        TOHALF ;
 %:24:kuusi%        TOHALF ;
 %:25:viisi%       TOHALF ;  
 %:26:neljä%     TOHALF ;  
 %:27:kolme%       TOHALF ;
 %:28:kaksi%       TOHALF ; 
 %:29:yksi%         TOHALF ;
%:3%0:puoli%         HOUR ;
%:31:yksi%         OVERHALF ;
%:32:kaksi%        OVERHALF ;
%:33:kolme%        OVERHALF ;
%34:neljä%       OVERHALF ;
 %:35:viisi%       OVERHALF ;
 %:36:kuusi%       OVERHALF ;
 %:37:seitsemän%        OVERHALF ;
 %:38:kahdeksan%       OVERHALF ; 
 %:39:yhdeksän%        OVERHALF ;
 %:4%0:kymmenen%        OVERHALF ;
 %:41:yhdeksäntoista%     TO ;
 %:42:kahdeksantoista%    TO ;
 %:43:seitsemäntoista%     TO ;
 %:44:kuusitoista%     TO ;
  %:45:vartti%            TO ;
 %:46:neljätoista%  TO ;
 %:47:kolmetoista%    TO ;
 %:48:kaksitoista%    TO ;
 %:49:yksitoista%      TO ;
 %:5%0:kymmenen%              TO ;
 %:51:yhdeksän%	          TO ;
 %:52:kahdeksan%             TO ;
 %:53:seitsemän%              TO ;
 %:54:kuusi%              TO ;
 %:55:viisi%             TO ;  
 %:56:neljä%           TO ;  
 %:57:kolme%             TO ;
 %:58:kaksi%             TO ; 
 %:59:yksi%               TO ;

LEXICON AFT
%:%0%0:                    HOUR ;
 %:%01:yksi%               OVER ;
 %:%02:kaksi%             OVER ;
 %:%03:kolme%             OVER ;
 %:%04:neljä%           OVER ;
 %:%05:viisi%             OVER ;
 %:%06:kuusi%              OVER ;
 %:%07:seitsemän%              OVER ;
 %:%08:kahdeksan%             OVER ;
 %:%09:yhdeksän%              OVER ;
 %:1%0:kymmenen%               OVER ;
 %:11:yksitoista%       OVER ;
 %:12:kaksitoista%     OVER ;
 %:13:kolmetoista%     OVER ;
 %:14:neljätoista%   OVER ;
  %:15:vartti%             OVER ;
 %:16:kuusitoista%      OVER ;
 %:17:seitsemäntoista%      OVER ;
 %:18:kahdeksantoista%     OVER ;
 %:19:yhdeksäntoista%      OVER ;

LEXICON TOHALF
 :vaille% puoli%  HOUR ;

LEXICON OVERHALF
 :yli% puoli%     HOUR ;

LEXICON TO
 :vaille%    HOUR ;

LEXICON OVER
 :yli%   HOUR ;

LEXICON HOUR
@U.TIME.1@:yksi@U.TIME.1@ ENDLEX ;
@U.TIME.2@:kaksi@U.TIME.2@ ENDLEX ;
@U.TIME.3@:kolme@U.TIME.3@ ENDLEX ;
@U.TIME.4@:neljä@U.TIME.4@ ENDLEX ;
@U.TIME.5@:viisi@U.TIME.5@ ENDLEX ;
@U.TIME.6@:kuusi@U.TIME.6@ ENDLEX ;
@U.TIME.7@:seitsemän@U.TIME.7@ ENDLEX ;
@U.TIME.8@:kahdeksan@U.TIME.8@ ENDLEX ;
@U.TIME.9@:yhdeksän@U.TIME.9@ ENDLEX ;
@U.TIME.10@:kymmenen@U.TIME.10@ ENDLEX ;
@U.TIME.11@:yksitoista@U.TIME.11@ ENDLEX ;
@U.TIME.12@:kaksitoista@U.TIME.12@ ENDLEX ;

LEXICON ENDLEX
# ;
